Louisiana, session 2026, HB863.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:55 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§55. Search with or without warrant
A. The secretary, the deputy secretary, or any commissioned wildlife
enforcement agent of the enforcement division may visit, inspect, and examine, with
or without a search warrant, records, any cold storage plant, warehouse, boat, store,
car, conveyance, automobile or other vehicle, airplane or other aircraft, basket or
other receptacle, or any place of deposit for wild birds, wild quadrupeds, fish, or
other aquatic life or any parts thereof whenever there is probable cause to believe
that a violation has occurred.
B. Commissioned wildlife enforcement agents of the enforcement division
are authorized to visit or inspect at frequent intervals without the need of search
warrants, records, cold storage plants, bait stands, warehouses, public restaurants,
public and private markets, stores, and places where wild birds, game quadrupeds,
fish, or other aquatic life or any parts thereof may be kept and offered for sale, for
the purpose of ascertaining whether any laws or regulations under the jurisdiction of
the department have been violated. They also shall inspect establishments for
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored are
additions.

HLS 26RS-177 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 863
commercial licenses required by the department to retail and/or wholesale
commercial fish and bait fish where applicable under the provisions of this Chapter.
The department may institute proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction for
violation of laws or regulations under its jurisdiction.